Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-606
Financial statements; filing requirements.

Every governing body of any political subdivision that is required by law to submit to an audit of its accounts shall provide and file with its secretary or clerk, in the year of its organization and each year thereafter, not later than August 1 of each year, financial statements showing its actual and budgeted figures for the most recently completed fiscal year.

Laws 1984, LB 932, § 2;

R.S.Supp.,1986, § 23-934.